Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.555

Assessment standards.

The department shall establish, by rule, standards for local health departments and networks to use in assessment, performance measurement, policy development, and assurance regarding social development to prevent health problems caused by risk factors empirically linked to: Violent criminal acts by juveniles, teen substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence. The standards shall be based on the standards set forth in the public health services improvement plan as required by RCW 43.70.550.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 8; 1998 c 245 s 77; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 204.]

NOTES:

Transition plan—Report to the legislature—2011 1st sp.s. c 32: See note following RCW 70.305.005.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.